Florida, session 2026, SB7034.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 15 16 Section 1.â(1)âThe following rule is ratified for the sole 17 and exclusive purpose of satisfying any condition on the 18 effectiveness imposed under s. 120.541(3), Florida Statutes: 19 Rule 62-42.300, Florida Administrative Code, titled âThe Lower 20 Santa Fe and Ichetucknee Rivers and Priority Springs,â as filed 21 for adoption with the Department of State pursuant to the 22 certification package dated December 31, 2025. 23 (2)âThis act serves no other purpose and may not be 24 codified in the Florida Statutes. After this act becomes a law, 25 its enactment and effective dates must be noted in the Florida 26 Administrative Code, the Florida Administrative Register, or 27 both, as appropriate. This act does not alter rulemaking 28 authority delegated by prior law, does not constitute 29 legislative preemption of or exception to any provision of law 30 governing adoption or enforcement of the rule cited, and is 31 intended to preserve the status of any cited rule as a rule 32 under chapter 120, Florida Statutes. This act does not cure any 33 rulemaking defect or preempt any challenge based on a lack of 34 authority or a violation of the legal requirements governing the 35 adoption of any rule cited. 36 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.